District of Columbia statutes.
11-742

Oaths, affirmations, and acknowledgments.

Each judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals and each employee of the court authorized by the chief judge may administer oaths and affirmations and take acknowledgments.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 481, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1973 Ed., § 11-742.
1981 Ed., § 11-742.